Maryland, session 2025, HB0138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–906.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0138*

HOUSE BILL 138
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible dependent” means:
(i) a child who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(e); or
(ii) a parent who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(i).
(3) “Eligible spouse” means a spouse who meets the requirements stated in
38 C.F.R. § 38.620(e).
(4) “RESERVE COMPONENT” MEANS:
(I) THE ARMY NATIONAL GUARD OF THE UNITED STATES;
(II) THE ARMY RESERVE;
(III) THE NAVY RESERVE;
(IV) THE MARINE CORPS RESERVE;
(V) THE AIR NATIONAL GUARD OF THE UNITED STATES;
(VI) THE AIR FORCE RESERVE;
(VII) THE COAST GUARD RESERVE;
(VIII) THE RESERVE CORPS OF THE U.S. PUBLIC HEALTH
SERVICE; OR
(IX) ANY OTHER RESERVE SERVICE INCLUDED IN 28 U.S.C. §
101(24).
(4) (5) “State veterans’ cemetery” means a cemetery that the
Department establishes under this section.
(5) (6) In this section and in § 9–907 of this subtitle, “veteran” means
an individual who:
(i) served other than dishonorably on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States; [or]
(ii) served other than dishonorably as a FULL–TIME member of the
[State militia ordered into active service of the United States by order of the President and

HOUSE BILL 138 3
was killed in the line of duty] COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE U.S. PUBLIC HEALTH
SERVICE OR THE COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE NATIONAL OCEANIC AND
ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION; OR
(III) SERVED OTHER THAN DISHONORABLY AND COMPLETED
THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATION OF SERVICE AS A MEMBER OF THE
NATIONAL GUARD OR THE MILITARY RESERVES A RESERVE COMPONENT.
(6) (7) “Washington Cemetery” means the Civil War cemetery grounds
authorized by Chapter 213 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 1870.
(f) To qualify for a plot in a State veterans’ cemetery:
(1) the applicant must be a veteran who meets the requirements for burial
at a national veterans’ cemetery or an eligible spouse or dependent of a veteran who meets
the requirements of this subsection; and
(2) if a veteran[, the veteran] IS A MEMBER OF THE NATIONAL GUARD
OR THE MILITARY RESERVES A RESERVE COMPONENT, THE MEMBER must also have
been a resident of the State:
(i) when the [veteran] MEMBER entered the armed forces
UNIFORMED SERVICES;
(ii) when the [veteran] MEMBER died; or
(iii) for 2 years, unless, for a reason that the Department finds
compelling, the Department waives the time period.
(i) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Department [shall bury the] MAY NOT CHARGE A veteran or eligible
spouse or dependent [without charge] FOR BURIAL.
(2) IF THE INDIVIDUAL BEING BURIED IS A MEMBER OF THE
NATIONAL GUARD OR THE MILITARY RESERVES A RESERVE COMPONENT OR THE
INDIVIDUAL’S ELIGIBLE DEPENDENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT AT THE
TIME OF BURIAL A FEE EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL PLOT ALLOWANCE ESTABLISHED BY
THE NATIONAL CEMETERY ADMINISTRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.